Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.53.060

Dissenting shareholders—May receive value in cash—Appraisal.

(1) The owner of shares of a trust company that were voted against a merger to result in a trust company shall be entitled to receive their value in cash, if and when the merger becomes effective, upon written demand made to the resulting trust company at any time within thirty days after the effective date of the merger, accompanied by the surrender of the share certificates. The value of the shares shall be determined, as of the date of the shareholders' meeting approving the merger, by three appraisers, one to be selected by the owners of two-thirds of the dissenting shares, one by the board of directors of the resulting trust company, and the third by the two so chosen. The valuation agreed upon by any two appraisers shall govern. If the appraisal is not completed within ninety days after the merger becomes effective, the director shall cause an appraisal to be made.

(2) The dissenting shareholders shall bear, on a pro rata basis based on number of dissenting shares owned, the cost of their appraisal and one-half of the cost of a third appraisal, and the resulting trust company shall bear the cost of its appraisal and one-half of the cost of the third appraisal. If the director causes an appraisal to be made, the cost of that appraisal shall be borne equally by the dissenting shareholders and the resulting trust company, with the dissenting shareholders sharing their half of the cost on a pro rata basis based on number of dissenting shares owned.

(3) The resulting trust company may fix an amount which it considers to be not more than the fair market value of the shares of a merging trust company at the time of the shareholders' meeting approving the merger, that it will pay dissenting shareholders of the trust company entitled to payment in cash. The amount due under an accepted offer or under the appraisal shall constitute a debt of the resulting trust company.

[ 2019 c 389 s 100; 2014 c 37 s 394.]